District of Columbia statutes.
26-1161.08

NMLS reporting requirements.

The Commissioner shall regularly report violations of the Banking Code, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the NMLS. The reports shall be subject to the provisions of § 26-1161.05.

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-172, § 9, 61 DCR 12577

History